Utah statutes.
58-9-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.
(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of funeral service,
except as specifically provided in Sections 58-1-307 and 58-9-305.
(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a
license in the classification of:
(a)  funeral service director;
(b)  funeral service intern;
(c)  funeral service establishment; or
(d)  preneed funeral arrangement sales agent.
